Utah statutes.
77-22-2.5.   Administrative subpoenas for criminal investigations for
records concerning an electronic communication system or service or remote
computing service -- Content -- Fee for providing information.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a) (i)  "Electronic communication" means any transfer of signs, signals,
writing, images, sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in
whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or
photooptical system.
(ii)  "Electronic communication" does not include:
(A)  any wire or oral communication;
(B)  any communication made through a tone-only paging device;
(C)  any communication from a tracking device; or
(D)  electronic funds transfer information stored by a financial institution
in a communications system used for the electronic storage and transfer of
funds.
(b)  "Electronic communications service" means any service which provides for
users the ability to send or receive wire or electronic communications.
(c) "Electronic communications system" means any wire, radio, electromagnetic,
photooptical, or photoelectronic facilities for the transmission of wire or
electronic communications, and any computer facilities or related electronic
equipment for the electronic storage of the communication.
(d)  "Internet service provider" has the same definition as in Section
76-10-1230.
(e)  "Prosecutor" has the same definition as in Section 77-22-2.
(f)  "Sexual offense against a minor" means:
(i)  sexual exploitation of a minor as defined in Section 76-5a-3 or attempted
sexual exploitation of a minor;
(ii)  a sexual offense or attempted sexual offense committed against a minor
in violation of Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4, Sexual Offenses; or
(iii)  dealing in or attempting to deal in material harmful to a minor in
violation of Section 76-10-1206.
(g)  "Remote computing service" means the provision to the public of computer
storage or processing services by means of an electronic communications
system.
(2)  When a law enforcement agency is investigating a sexual offense against a
minor, an offense of stalking under Section 76-5-106.5, or an offense of child
kidnapping under Section 76-5-301.1, and has reasonable suspicion that an
electronic communications system or service or remote computing service has
been used in the commission of a criminal offense, the prosecutor may issue an
administrative subpoena, consistent with 18 U.S.C. 2703 and 18 U.S.C. 2702, to
the electronic communications system or service or remote computing service
provider that owns or controls the Internet protocol address, websites, email
address, or service to a specific telephone number, requiring the production
of the following information, if available, upon providing in the subpoena the
Internet protocol address, email address, telephone number, or other
identifier, and the dates and times the address, telephone number, or other
identifier was suspected of being used in the commission of the offense:
(a)  names;
(b)  addresses;
(c)  local and long distance telephone connections;
(d)  records of session times and durations;
(e)  length of service, including the start date and types of service
utilized;
(f)  telephone or other instrument subscriber numbers or other subscriber
identifiers, including any temporarily assigned network address; and
(g)  means and sources of payment for the service, including any credit card
or bank account numbers.
(3)  A subpoena issued under this section shall state that the  electronic
communications system or service or remote computing service provider shall
produce any records under Subsections (2)(a) through (g) that are reasonably
relevant to the investigation of the suspected criminal activity or offense as
described in the subpoena.
(4) (a)  An electronic communications system or service or remote computing
service provider that provides information in response to a subpoena issued
under this section may charge a fee, not to exceed the actual cost, for
providing the information.
(b)  The law enforcement agency conducting the investigation shall pay the
fee.
(5)  The electronic communications system or service or remote computing
service provider served with or responding to the subpoena may not disclose
the subpoena to the account holder identified pursuant to the subpoena.
(6)  If the electronic communications system or service or remote computing
service provider served with the subpoena does not own or control the Internet
protocol address, websites, or email address, or provide service for the
telephone number that is the subject of the subpoena, the provider shall:
(a)  notify the investigating law enforcement agency that it does not have the
information; and
(b)  provide to the investigating law enforcement agency any information the
provider knows, through reasonable effort, that it has regarding how to locate
the Internet service provider that does own or control the Internet protocol
address, websites, or email address, or provide service for the telephone
number.
(7)  There is no cause of action against any provider or wire or electronic
communication service, or its officers, employees, agents, or other specified
persons, for providing information, facilities, or assistance in accordance
with the terms of the administrative subpoena issued under this section or
statutory authorization.
(8) (a)  An administrative subpoena issued under this section is subject to
the provisions of Title 77, Chapter 23b, Access to Electronic Communications.
(b)  Rights and remedies for providers and subscribers under Title 77, Chapter
23b, Access to Electronic Communications, apply to providers and subscribers
subject to an administrative subpoena issued under this section.
(9)  Every prosecutorial agency shall annually on or before June 30 report to
the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice the number of administrative
subpoenas issued by the agency during the previous calendar year.
(10)  State and local prosecutorial and law enforcement agencies shall
annually on or before June 30 report to the Commission on Criminal and
Juvenile Justice the number of administrative subpoenas the agency requested
that any federal law enforcement agency issue during the prior calendar year.
